Vermont, session 2025-2026, H214.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. chapter 20A is added to read:
CHAPTER 20A. SAFE HARBOR AWARD PROGRAM
§ 621. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Collateral costs” means any necessary out-of-pocket expenses that
are ancillary to the receipt of reproductive health care services or gender-
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 2 of 7
affirming health care services, or both, in this State, including costs for travel,
lodging, and meals but not including the cost of the reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services themselves.
(2) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(3) “Health care provider” means an individual, partnership,
corporation, facility, or institution licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized
by law to provide professional health care services in this State to an individual
during that individual’s medical care, treatment, or confinement.
(4) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention,
treatment, cure, or relief of a physical or mental health condition, including
counseling, procedures, products, devices, and medications.
(5) “Health information” means information relating to the past, present,
or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual; the provision
of health care services to an individual; or the past, present, or future payment
for the provision of health care services to an individual.
(6) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization with tax-exempt
status under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(7) “Patient-identifiable data” means any information, including health
information, that identifies or may reasonably be used as a basis to identify an
individual patient.
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 3 of 7
(8) “Reproductive health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
§ 622. SAFE HARBOR AWARD PROGRAM
(a) There is created the Safe Harbor Award Program to provide monetary
awards to pay for collateral costs incurred by Vermont residents and out-of-
state residents who receive reproductive health care services or gender-
affirming health care services, or both, in this State.
(b) The Safe Harbor Award Program is authorized to provide monetary
awards directly to:
(1) any health care provider in Vermont who provides reproductive
health care services or gender-affirming health care services, or both; and
(2) any nonprofit organization in Vermont whose mission includes
providing funding for reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
health care services, or both.
(c) Monetary awards shall be used to pay for:
(1) significant collateral costs, as determined by the Safe Harbor Fund
Board, incurred by Vermont residents in receiving reproductive health care
services or gender-affirming health care services, or both, in this State; and
(2) any collateral costs incurred by out-of-state residents in receiving
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health care services, or
both, in this State.
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 4 of 7
(d)(1) For applicants assisting Vermont patients, the Board shall give
priority consideration to applicants serving patients with the greatest financial
need and to applicants serving patients who live in underserved areas of the
State.
(2) For applicants assisting out-of-state patients, the Board shall give
priority consideration to applicants serving patients with the greatest financial
need and to applicants serving patients who live in states with limited access to
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health care services, or
both.
(e) The monetary award process shall not require the collection or retention
of any patient-identifiable data.
(f) The Treasurer may make and enter into contracts, agreements,
memoranda of understanding, partnerships, and other arrangements to
collaborate, cooperate, coordinate, contract, or combine resources with other
governmental entities, including other states and their agencies and
instrumentalities, to pay for collateral costs incurred by Vermont residents and
out-of-state residents receiving reproductive health care services or gender-
affirming health care services, or both, through the Safe Harbor Award
Program or a similar program.
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 5 of 7
§ 623. SAFE HARBOR FUND
(a) There is established the Safe Harbor Fund as a special fund pursuant to
32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, to be administered by the Treasurer. The
purpose of the Fund is to provide funds for and support the administration of
the Safe Harbor Award Program established in this chapter.
(b) The Fund may receive State appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds,
and funds from any other public or private source. Monies from the Fund may
be expended for monetary awards and for administrative and related purposes.
(c)(1) Nothwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5
to the contrary, interest earned by the Fund shall remain in the Fund.
(2) The Treasurer’s annual financial report to the Governor and the
General Assembly shall contain an accounting of the receipts, disbursements,
and earnings of the Fund; provided, however, that disbursement information
shall not be reported in a manner that allows for the identification of any
specific health care provider or nonprofit organization.
(3) Patient-identifiable data and information relating to the identity of
health care provider and nonprofit organization applicants and award recipients
is exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act
and shall be kept confidential.
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 6 of 7
§ 624. SAFE HARBOR FUND BOARD
(a) The Safe Harbor Fund shall be administered by the Safe Harbor Fund
Board, which shall be composed of five members as follows:
(1) The State Treasurer or designee, who shall serve as chair.
(2) Four members appointed by the Treasurer, at least one of whom
shall be a health care provider who provides reproductive health care services
or gender-affirming health care services, or both, and at least one of whom
shall have experience working with health care providers who provide
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health care services, or
both. In making appointments pursuant to this subdivision, the Treasurer shall
use best efforts to make appointments that reflect the racial, gender, and
geographic diversity of the population of this State.
(b) The Board shall adopt policies and procedures for the allocation of
monies from the Fund in accordance with this chapter, including policies and
procedures regarding:
(1) applying for an allocation from the Fund;
(2) determinations of eligibility of a health care provider or nonprofit
organization to receive an allocation from the Fund;
(3) determinations of eligibility of a cost or expense for reimbursement
under this chapter;
(4) considerations of need, including financial need; and
VT LEG #380486 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.214
2025 Page 7 of 7
(5) coordination with any other states or with a national or regional
network created for a similar purpose, including the acceptance of funding
transferred for use by the Safe Harbor Award Program.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380486 v.1